Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1576
Discovery of property of debtor; reference.

The judge may in his discretion order a reference to a referee agreed upon or appointed by him, to report the evidence of the facts.

R.S.1867, Code § 545, p. 489;

R.S.1913, § 8124;

C.S.1922, § 9060;

C.S.1929, § 20-1578;

R.S.1943, § 25-1576.